Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.340

Disposition of unneeded property.

Except as otherwise provided herein, a metropolitan municipal corporation may sell, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property acquired in connection with any authorized metropolitan function and which is no longer required for the purposes of the metropolitan municipal corporation in the same manner as provided for cities. When the metropolitan council determines that a metropolitan facility or any part thereof which has been acquired from a component city or county without compensation is no longer required for metropolitan purposes, but is required as a local facility by the city or county from which it was acquired, the metropolitan council shall by resolution transfer it to such city or county.

[ 1993 c 240 s 9; 1965 c 7 s 35.58.340. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 34.]